Mississippi, session 2026, HB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Childcare Teachers Shortage Task Force. The purpose of the task force is to study the Mississippi childcare worker shortage and how to increase the supply of affordable childcare seats while also recognizing educators for their ongoing efforts to improve Mississippi's early education and care system. (2)  The Mississippi Childcare Teachers Shortage Task Force shall be comprised of the following members: (a)  One (1) member of the Mississippi Senate, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (b)  One (1) member of the Mississippi House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; (c)  The Executive Director of Human Services, or a designee, as an ex officio member; (d)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Employment Services, or a designee, as an ex officio member; (e)  One (1) representative of the childcare provider community, to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development; (f)  One (1) representative of the economic development community, to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development; and (g)  One (1) representative of business and industry, to be appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Office of Workforce Development. (3)  Appointments shall be made within thirty (30) days after the sine die adjournment of the 2026 Regular Session.  At the first meeting, the task force shall elect a chair and a vice chair.  The task force shall meet and organize fifteen (15) days after all appointments have been made.  The vice chair shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the task force.  A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force shall be required.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, such notices to be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held.  Members of the task force shall not be compensated or reimbursed for travel expenses. (4)  The task force shall study and make a report on the following: (a)  Whether a wage incentive program for childcare teachers would yield positive results in Mississippi; (b)  The wage incentive programs offered to childcare teachers in other states; (c)  How to address the childcare teacher shortage in Mississippi; (d)  How other states have addressed their childcare teacher shortages; and (e)  Other childcare related issues that the task force deems necessary to review and study. (5)  The task force shall submit its report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Chairmen of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees, Chairman of the House Workforce Development Committee and Chairman of the Senate Economic and Workforce Development Committee by December 1, 2026.  After such report is submitted, the task force shall be dissolved. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.